North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-06.2 Commercial Driver’s Licenses
39-06.2-10.
Disqualification and cancellation.

An individual is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than one year if convicted of a first violation of:

Driving a commercial motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or drugs;

Leaving the scene of an accident involving a commercial motor vehicle driven by the individual in violation of section 39-08-04, 39-08-05, 39-08-07, or 39-08-09;

Using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any felony as defined in this chapter;

Refusal to submit to a test to determine the driver’s alcohol concentration while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or

Driving or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the individual’s blood, breath, or urine is four one-hundredths of one percent or more by weight.

An individual is disqualified for a period of not less than sixty days for providing false information to the department related to the issuance of a commercial permit or commercial license or for a period of not less than one year if convicted of fraud related to the issuance of a commercial driver’s permit or license.

An individual is disqualified for life if convicted of two or more violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection 1, 8, 10, or 12, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two or more separate incidents. Only offenses committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle after July 1, 1989, may be considered in applying this subsection. Only offenses committed while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle after August 1, 2003, may be considered in applying this subsection.

The director may adopt rules under section 39-06.2-14, establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which a disqualification for life under subsections 3, 9, 11, and 13 may be reduced to a period of not less than ten years.

An individual is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life who uses a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance.

An individual is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than sixty days if convicted of two serious traffic violations, or one hundred twenty days if convicted of three serious traffic violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period.

Disqualification for railroad-highway grade crossing violation:

A driver who is convicted of driving a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state, or local law or regulation pertaining to any one of the following six offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing is disqualified for the period of time specified in subdivision b:

For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;

For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;

For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop before driving onto the crossing;

For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive completely through the crossing without stopping;

For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or the directions of an enforcement official at the crossing; and

For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of insufficient undercarriage clearance.

Duration of disqualification for a railroad-highway grade crossing violation:

A driver is disqualified for not less than sixty days if the driver is convicted of a first violation of a railroad-highway grade crossing violation.

A driver is disqualified for not less than one hundred twenty days if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a second railroad-highway grade crossing violation in separate incidents.

A driver is disqualified for not less than one year if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade crossing violation in separate incidents.

For a first conviction of driving while under the influence of alcohol or being under the influence of a controlled substance or refusal to be tested while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle, a holder of a commercial driver’s license or learner’s permit must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for one year.

For a second or subsequent conviction of driving while under the influence or being under the influence of a controlled substance or refusal to be tested while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle, a holder of a commercial driver’s license or learner’s permit must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life.

For a first conviction for leaving the scene of an accident while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle, a holder of a commercial driver’s license or learner’s permit must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for one year.

For a second or subsequent conviction for leaving the scene of an accident while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle, a holder of a commercial driver’s license or learner’s permit must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life.

For a first conviction for using a vehicle to commit a felony while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle, a holder of a commercial driver’s license or learner’s permit must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for one year.

For a second or subsequent conviction for using a vehicle to commit a felony while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle, a holder of a commercial driver’s license or learner’s permit must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life.

For a conviction for using a vehicle in the commission of a felony involving manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing a controlled substance while operating a commercial motor vehicle or a noncommercial motor vehicle, a holder of a commercial driver’s license or learner’s permit must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life.

An individual who is convicted of using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony involving an act or practice of severe forms of trafficking of persons as defined in the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Reauthorization Act of 2017 [Pub. L. 115-427, 132 Stat. 5503; 22 U.S.C. 7102] is disqualified permanently from driving a commercial motor vehicle, without the possibility of reinstatement.

For a second conviction of any combination of two serious traffic violations, in a separate incident within a three-year period while operating a noncommercial vehicle, a learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license holder must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle, if the conviction results in the revocation, cancellation, or suspension of the learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license holder’s license or noncommercial driving privileges, for a period of sixty days.

For a third or subsequent conviction of any combination of serious traffic violations, in a separate incident within a three-year period while operating a noncommercial motor vehicle, a person required to have a learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license and a learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license holder must be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one hundred twenty days.

Before suspending, revoking, or disqualifying a driver under this section, the director must provide the driver with notice of opportunity for hearing, in accordance with section 39-06-33, and the hearing requested must be held in accordance with section 39-06-33.

After suspending, revoking, disqualifying, or canceling a commercial driver’s license, the director shall update the director’s records to reflect that action within ten days. After suspending, revoking, or canceling a nondomiciled commercial driver’s privileges, the director shall notify the licensing authority of the state that issued the commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit within ten days.

A foreign commercial driver is subject to disqualification under this section.

If any of the above violations occurred while transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded, the individual is disqualified for a period of not less than three years.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 1993, ch. 383, § 3; 2001, ch. 344, § 3; 2003, ch. 322, § 5; 2005, ch. 329, § 6; 2007, ch. 326, § 2; 2009, ch. 328, § 4; 2011, ch. 271, § 14; 2013, ch. 298, § 9; 2015, ch. 265, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 321, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 292, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 3 of chapter 265, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-06.2-10.1.
Prohibited alcohol offenses for commercial motor vehicle drivers.

Any person who drives or is in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle within this state with an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight must, in addition to any other sanctions which may be imposed under this code, be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under section 39-06.2-10.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 4.

39-06.2-10.2.
Implied consent requirements for commercial motor vehicle drivers.

A person who drives or is in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent to take a test or tests of that person’s blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining that person’s alcohol concentration, or the presence of other drugs. The result of any test administered within two hours of driving or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle is that person’s alcohol concentration. The test must be conducted pursuant to the provisions of section 39-20-07.

A test or tests may be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer who, after stopping or detaining the commercial motor vehicle driver, has probable cause to believe that driver was driving a commercial motor vehicle while having alcohol or drugs in the driver’s system.

A person requested to submit to a test as provided in subsection 1 or 5 must be warned by the law enforcement officer requesting the test that a refusal to submit to the test will result in that person being immediately placed out of service for a period of twenty-four hours and being disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than one year under section 39-06.2-10.

If the person refuses testing, or submits to a test that discloses an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the law enforcement officer must submit a certified report to the director certifying that the test was requested pursuant to subsection 1 or 5 and that the person refused to submit to testing, or submitted to a test under subsection 1 which disclosed an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

A person who drives or is in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent to an onsite alcohol screening test under section 39-20-14.

Upon receipt of the certified report of a law enforcement officer submitted under subsection 4, the director must disqualify the driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle under section 39-06.2-10.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 5.

39-06.2-10.3.
Action following test result for a resident driver.

If a person submits to a test under section 39-06.2-10.2 and the test shows that person to have an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight at the time of the performance of a chemical test within two hours after the driving or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle, the following procedures apply:

When a breath sample test result derived under section 39-20-07 reveals a resident driver to have an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the law enforcement officer shall immediately issue the driver an out-of-service order as provided for in section 39-06.2-10.9. If the driver then has valid driving privileges, the law enforcement officer must issue to the driver a temporary driver’s permit, in accordance with section 39-06.2-10.8.

If a test administered under section 39-06.2-10.2 was by a urine or blood sample and the person tested is not a resident of an area in which the law enforcement officer has jurisdiction, the law enforcement officer shall, on receiving the analysis of the sample by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee showing that person had an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, either proceed in accordance with subsection 1 during that person’s reappearance within the officer’s jurisdiction or notify a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the person lives. On that notification, that law enforcement agency shall immediately issue to that person a temporary driver’s permit according to section 39-06.2-10.8.

The halting officer, within five days of the issuance of the temporary driver’s permit, shall forward to the director a certified written report in the form required by the director and the person’s commercial driver’s license taken under subsection 1 or 2. If the person was issued a temporary driver’s permit because of the results of a test, the report must show that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while in violation of section 39-06.2-10.1, that the person was lawfully detained, that the person was tested for alcohol concentration under this chapter, and that the results of the test show that the person had an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight. In addition to the commercial driver’s license and report, the law enforcement officer must forward to the director a certified copy of the operational checklist and test records of a breath test and a copy of the certified copy of the analytical report for a blood or urine test for all tests administered at the direction of the officer.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 6; 2005, ch. 195, § 14; 2011, ch. 271, § 15.

39-06.2-10.4.
Action following test result or refusal of testing by nonresident driver.

If a driver licensed in another state refuses, in this state, a test provided under section 39-06.2-10.2 or submits to a test under section 39-06.2-10.2, and the test results show an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the following procedures apply:

When a breath sample test result, derived under section 39-20-07, reveals the driver to have alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the halting officer, without taking possession of the person’s out-of-state driver’s license, shall inform the driver of the test results and issue an out-of-service order according to section 39-06.2-10.9 and a temporary driver’s permit according to section 39-06.2-10.8.

When a urine or blood sample test result, derived under section 39-20-07, reveals an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the halting officer shall mail the person a temporary driver’s permit issued according to section 39-06.2-10.8 and a notice as provided under section 39-06.1-07.

The law enforcement officer, within five days of issuing the temporary driver’s permit, shall forward to the director a certified written report in the form required by the director and a certified copy of the operational checklist and test records of a breath test and a copy of the certified copy of the analytical report for a blood or urine test for all tests administered at the direction of the officer. If the person was issued a temporary driver’s permit because of the person’s refusal to submit to a test under sections 39-06.2-10.2 and 39-20-14, the report must include information as provided in section 39-06.2-10.3. If the person was issued a temporary driver’s permit because of the results of a test, the report must show that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while in violation of section 39-06.2-10.1, that the person was lawfully detained, that the person was tested for alcohol concentration under this chapter, and that the results of the test show that the person had an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 7.

Collateral References.

Mental incapacity as justifying refusal to submit to tests for driving while intoxicated, 76 A.L.R.5th 597.

39-06.2-10.5.
Revocation of privilege to drive commercial motor vehicle upon refusal to submit to testing.

If a person refuses to submit to testing under section 39-06.2-10.2, the law enforcement officer shall immediately take possession of the person’s driver’s license and issue to that person a temporary driver’s permit. The director, upon the receipt of that person’s driver’s license and a certified written report of the law enforcement officer in the form required by the director, forwarded by the officer within five days after issuing the temporary driver’s permit, showing that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while in violation of section 39-06.2-10.1 or, had reason to believe that the person committed a moving traffic violation or was involved in a traffic accident as a driver, and in conjunction with the violation or accident the officer has, through the officer’s observations, formulated an opinion that the person’s body contains alcohol, that the person was lawfully detained, and that the person had refused to submit to the screening test under section 39-06.2-10.2, shall revoke that person’s commercial driver’s license or permit to drive and any nondomiciled commercial driver’s privilege for the appropriate period under section 39-06.2-10, or if the person is a resident without a commercial driver’s license or permit, the director shall deny to the person the issuance of a commercial driver’s license or permit for the appropriate period under section 39-06.2-10 after the date of the alleged violation, subject to the opportunity for a prerevocation hearing and postrevocation review as provided in this chapter. In the revocation of the person’s driver’s license the director shall give credit for time in which the person was without a driver’s license after the day of the person’s refusal to submit to the test except that the director may not give credit for time in which the person retained driving privileges through a temporary driver’s permit.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 8; 2013, ch. 298, § 10.

Collateral References.

Mental incapacity as justifying refusal to submit to tests for driving while intoxicated, 76 A.L.R.5th 597.

39-06.2-10.6.
Administrative hearing on request.

Before issuing an order of suspension, revocation, or disqualification under section 39-06.2-10, the director shall afford that person an opportunity for a hearing as provided by section 39-20-05, if the person mails a request for the hearing to the director within ten days after the date of issuance of the temporary driver’s permit.

If the issue to be determined by the hearing concerns license suspension for operating a commercial motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the hearing must be before a hearing officer assigned by the director and at a time and place designated by the director. The hearing must be recorded and its scope may cover only the issues of whether the arresting officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle in violation of section 39-06.2-10.1, whether the person was lawfully detained, whether the person was tested in accordance with section 39-06.2-10.2, and whether the test results show the person had an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight. For purposes of this section, a copy of a certified copy of an analytical report of a blood or urine sample from the office of the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee, or a certified copy of the checklist and test records from a certified breath test operator establish prima facie the alcohol concentration shown therein. Whether the person was warned that the privilege to drive might be suspended based on the results of the test is not an issue.

If the issue to be determined by the hearing concerns license revocation for refusing to submit to a test under section 39-06.2-10.2, the hearing must be before a hearing officer assigned by the director at a time and place designated by the director. The hearing must be recorded. The scope of a hearing for refusing to submit to a test under section 39-06.2-10.2 may cover only the issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle in violation of section 39-06.2-10.1, whether the person was lawfully detained, and whether that person refused to submit to the test or tests. The scope of a hearing for refusing to submit to a test under subsection 3 of section 39-06.2-10.4 may cover only the issues of whether the law enforcement officer had reason to believe the person committed a moving traffic violation or was involved in a traffic accident as a driver, whether in conjunction with the violation or the accident the officer has, through the officer’s observations, formulated an opinion that the person’s body contains alcohol and, whether the person refused to submit to the onsite screening test. Whether the person was warned that the privilege to drive would be revoked or denied for refusal to submit to the test or tests is not an issue.

At a hearing under this section, the regularly kept records of the director and the state crime laboratory may be introduced. Those records establish prima facie their contents without further foundation. For purposes of this chapter, the following are deemed regularly kept records of the director and the state crime laboratory:

Any copy of a certified copy of an analytical report of a blood or urine sample received by the director from the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee or a law enforcement officer, a certified copy of the checklist and test records received by the director from a certified breath test operator; and

Any copy of a certified copy of a certificate of the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee relating to approved methods, devices, operators, materials, and checklists used for testing for alcohol concentration received by the director from the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee, that have been electronically posted with the state crime laboratory division of the attorney general at the attorney general website.

At the close of the hearing, the hearing officer shall notify the person of the hearing officer’s findings of fact, conclusions of law, and decision based on the findings and conclusions and shall immediately deliver to the person a copy of the decision. If the hearing officer does not find in favor of the person, the copy of the decision serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the revocation, suspension, or denial of driving privileges in this state. If the hearing officer finds, based on a preponderance of the evidence, that the person refused a test under section 39-06.2-10.2 or that the person had an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the hearing officer shall immediately take possession of the person’s temporary driver’s permit issued under this chapter. If the hearing officer does not find against the person, the hearing officer shall sign, date, and mark on the person’s permit an extension of driving privileges for the next twenty days and shall return the permit to the person. The hearing officer shall report the findings, conclusions, and decisions to the director within ten days of the conclusion of the hearing. If the hearing officer has determined in favor of the person, the director shall return the person’s commercial driver’s license by regular mail to the address on file with the director under section 39-06.2-08.

If the person who requested a hearing under this section fails to appear at the hearing without justification, the right to the hearing is waived, and the hearing officer’s determination on license revocation, suspension, or denial will be based on the written request for hearing, law enforcement officer’s report, and other evidence as may be available. On the date for which the hearing is scheduled, the hearing officer shall mail to the person, by regular mail, at the address on file with the director under section 39-06-20, or at any other address for the person or the person’s legal representative supplied in the request for hearing, a copy of the decision which serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the revocation, suspension, or denial of driving privileges in this state. Even if the person for whom the hearing is scheduled fails to appear at the hearing, the hearing is deemed to have been held on the date for which it is scheduled for purposes of appeal under section 39-06.2-10.7.

A hearing under this section may be conducted in whole or in part by telephone, television, virtual online interface, or other electronic means with the consent of the licensee. A hearing officer may provide a notice, decision, or order under this section by mail or other means as authorized by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 9; 1999, ch. 278, § 61; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2005, ch. 195, § 15; 2011, ch. 288, § 12; 2021, ch. 290, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

39-06.2-10.7.
Judicial review.

Any person whose commercial driver’s license or privilege has been suspended, revoked, or denied by the decision of the hearing officer under section 39-06.2-10.6 may appeal within seven days after the date of the hearing under section 39-06.2-10.6 as shown by the date of the hearing officer’s decision, section 28-32-42 notwithstanding, by serving on the director and filing a notice of appeal and specifications of error in the district court in the county where the events occurred for which the demand for a test was made, or in the county in which the administrative hearing was held. The court shall set the matter for hearing, and the petitioner shall give twenty days’ notice of the hearing to the director and to the hearing officer who rendered the decision. Neither the director nor the court may stay the decision pending decision on appeal. Within twenty days after receipt of the notice of appeal, the director or the hearing officer who rendered the decision shall file in the office of the clerk of court to which the appeal is taken a certified transcript of the testimony and all other proceedings. It is the record on which the appeal must be determined. No additional evidence may be heard. The court shall affirm the decision of the director or hearing officer unless it finds the evidence insufficient to warrant the conclusion reached by the director or hearing officer. The court may direct that the matter be returned to the director or hearing officer for rehearing and the presentation of additional evidence.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 10; 2001, ch. 293, § 17.

39-06.2-10.8.
Temporary driver’s permit.

A temporary driver’s permit extends driving privileges for twenty-five days, unless earlier terminated by the decision of a hearing officer under section 39-06.2-10.6. The law enforcement officer must sign and note the date of issuance on the temporary driver’s permit. The temporary driver’s permit serves as the director’s official notification to the driver of the director’s intent to revoke, suspend, or deny driving privileges in this state. No temporary driver’s permit may be issued for the period covered by an out-of-service order.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 11.

39-06.2-10.9.
Out-of-service order — Rules.

The director shall adopt rules for the issuance and enforcement of out-of-service orders. The rules must be in accordance with the standards and requirements of the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 [Pub. L. 99-570; 100 Stat. 3207-179; 49 App. U.S.C. 2708] and 49 CFR parts 383 and 392.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 383, § 12.

39-06.2-11.
License reissuance — Class D license.

The director may issue a class D driver’s license to a driver suspended, revoked, or disqualified under this chapter when:

The suspension, revocation, or disqualification arises from a violation under this chapter which would not require similar sanctions under chapter 39-06, 39-06.1, or 39-20.

The period of suspension, revocation, or disqualification imposed for a violation under this chapter is greater than that which could have been imposed under chapter 39-06, 39-06.1, or 39-20 for the same violation, and the period of suspension or revocation provided for under chapter 39-06, 39-06.1, or 39-20 has been satisfied under the existing suspension or revocation.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 1993, ch. 383, § 13.

39-06.2-12.
Notification of traffic convictions.

Within ten days after receiving a report of the conviction of any nondomiciled holder of a commercial driver’s license for any violation of state or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle, the director shall notify the driver’s licensing authority in the licensing state of the conviction.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 2013, ch. 298, § 11.

39-06.2-13.
Driving record information to be furnished. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 421, § 1.

39-06.2-13.1.
Driving record information to be provided.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and upon payment of a fee listed in section 39-06.2-19, the director shall provide full information regarding the driving record of an individual who has been issued a commercial driver’s license to an employer or to a prospective employer if the individual has given written consent to the prospective employer for this information.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 1; 2013, ch. 300, § 5.

39-06.2-14.
Rulemaking authority.

The director may, pursuant to chapter 28-32, adopt any rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4.

39-06.2-15.
Authority to enter agreements.

The director may enter into or make agreements, arrangements, or declarations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4.

39-06.2-16.
Reciprocity.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may drive a commercial motor vehicle in this state if the individual has a valid commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit issued by any state, province or territory of Canada, or licencia federal de conductor issued by Mexico in accordance with the minimum federal standards for the issuance of a commercial motor vehicle driver’s license, if the individual’s license or permit is not suspended, revoked, or canceled, and if the individual is not disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle.

The director must give all out-of-state convictions full faith and credit if the driver is licensed by this state at the time of the conviction or becomes licensed by this state at a later time and treat them for sanctioning purposes under this chapter as if they occurred in this state. For purposes of this section, originals, photostatic copies, or electronic transmissions of the records of the driver’s licensing or other authority of the other jurisdiction are sufficient evidence whether or not they are certified copies.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 2003, ch. 312, § 6; 2007, ch. 326, § 3; 2013, ch. 298, § 12.

39-06.2-17.
Hours of service exemption — Transportation of agricultural commodities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 339, § 1; 1999, ch. 345, § 1; repealed by 2021, ch. 280, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

39-06.2-18.
Imminent hazard disqualification — Records.

A disqualification imposed in accordance with the provisions of 49 CFR part 383.52 relating to notification from the federal motor carrier safety administration that the driver is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle and is determined to constitute an imminent hazard becomes a part of the driver’s record maintained by the director.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

39-06.2-19.
Fees — Deposit in highway fund.

All money received under this chapter must be paid monthly to the highway fund in the state treasury.

The fee for:

A commercial driver’s license test is five dollars.

An application for a commercial driver’s license or permit is fifteen dollars.

Each endorsement is three dollars.

A nonresident commercial driver’s license is twenty dollars.

The driving record for an employer or prospective employer is three dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 300, § 6.